hu: Irodai kellékek > Tárolás és rendezés > Kötőkellékek > Kötőkiegészítők: Kötőgyűrűk; Indexosztók; Lapvédők
hr-HR: Uredski materijal > Pohrana i organizacija > Pribor za uvez > Pribor za registratore: Prstenovi za vezivanje; Pregrade za indeksiranje; Košuljice
pl: Artykuły biurowe > Sortowanie i utrzymanie porządku > Oprawa dokumentów > Akcesoria do segregatorów: Mechanizmy; Przekładki; Koszulki na dokumenty
nl: Kantoorartikelen > Archiveren en indelen > Benodigdheden voor inbinden > Accessoires voor ringbanden: Ringbandringen; Tabbladen; Insteekhoezen
pt-PT: Materiais de escritório > Arquivo e organização > Acessórios de encadernação > Acessórios para capas de arquivo: Argolas para capas de arquivo; Divisores de indexação; Protetores de folhas
sv: Kontorsmaterial > Arkiv och organisering > Pärmmaterial > Pärmtillbehör: Pärmringar; Pärmregister; Arkskydd
da: Kontorforsyning > Arkivering og organisering > Indbinding – tilbehør > Ringbind – tilbehør: Ringbind – ringe; Kartoteksinddelere; Plastlommer
bg-BG: Офис консумативи > Картотека и организация > Консумативи за подвързване > Аксесоари за класьори: Халки за класьори; Индексни разделители; Джобове за документи
en: Office Supplies > Filing & Organization > Binding Supplies > Binder Accessories: Binder Rings; Index Dividers; Sheet Protectors
pt-BR: Materiais de escritório > Arquivamento e organização > Suprimentos para encadernação > Acessórios para fichários: Anéis para encadernação; Divisores indexadores; Protetores de folhas
nb: Kontormateriell > Arkivering og organisering > Ringpermutstyr > Ringpermtilbehør: Ringpermringer; Deleark; Arkbeskyttere
fi: Toimistotarvikkeet > Arkistointi ja järjestys > Kansiotarvikkeet > Kansioiden lisätarvikkeet: Kansiorenkaat; Välilehdet; Muovitaskut
ja: オフィス用品 > ファイル・バインダー > バインダー・製本用品 > バインダー関連用品: バインダーリング; インデックス; クリアポケット
th: อุปกรณ์สำนักงาน > การจัดเก็บเอกสารและการจัดระเบียบ > อุปกรณ์เข้าเล่ม > อุปกรณ์เย็บเล่ม: สันห่วง; ตัวแบ่งดัชนี; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันกระดาษ
lt-LT: Biuro reikmenys > Bylų saugojimas ir tvarkymas > Įrišimo reikmenys > Segtuvų priedai: Segtuvų žiedai; Rodyklės skirtukai; Lapų įmautės
el: Προμήθειες γραφείου > Αρχειοθέτηση & οργάνωση > Προμήθειες βιβλιοδεσίας > Αξεσουάρ βιβλιοδεσίας: Δακτύλιοι συνδετήρων; Διαχωριστικά ευρετηρίου; Προστατευτικά φύλλων
vi: Văn phòng phẩm > Kẹp tài liệu và ngăn chia tài liệu > Kẹp tài liệu > Phụ kiện bìa kẹp: Gáy lò xo; Bìa ngăn hồ sơ; Bìa lỗ
zh-TW: 辦公室用品 > 收納整理用品 > 裝訂用品 > 裝訂配件: 活頁圈; 分頁紙; 透明資料袋
sl-SI: Pisarniški material > Zlaganje in urejanje dokumentov > Potrebščine za vezavo > Dodatki za mape: Obroči za mape; Razdelilniki kazal; Zaščitne folije
it: Forniture per ufficio > Archiviazione e organizzazione > Forniture per rilegature > Accessori rilegatura: Anelli per rilegatura; Divisori indici; Protezioni fogli
ro-RO: Consumabile de birou > Clasare și organizare > Materiale pentru legat > Accesorii pentru bibliorafturi: Inele bibliorafturi; Separatoare; Protecții file
tr: Büro Malzemeleri > Dosyalama ve Organizasyon > Ciltleme Malzemeleri > Ciltleme Aksesuarları: Cilt Halkaları; İndeks Ayraçları; Sayfa Koruyucular
es: Material de oficina > Clasificación y organización > Materiales de encuadernación > Accesorios de encuadernación: Anillas de encuadernación; Separadores; Fundas protectoras
ko: 사무용품 > 서류 정리 용품 > 바인더 용품 > 바인더 부대용품: 바인더 링; 색인 디바이더; 바인더 비닐 속지
sk-SK: Kancelárske potreby > Kartotéka a organizácia > Viazacie potreby > Príslušenstvo k zakladačom: Krúžky zakladača; Indexové deliče; Listové chrániče
ru: Товары для офиса и канцтовары > Органайзеры и товары для хранения документов > Товары для брошюровки > Аксессуары для папок-регистраторов: Кольца для папок-регистраторов; Разделители с указателями; Файлы-вкладыши
cs: Kancelářské potřeby > Třídění a uspořádání dokumentů > Vázací potřeby > Vazačky – příslušenství: Vázací kroužky; Kartotékové listy; Ochranné fólie
fr: Fournitures de bureau > Classement et organisation > Matériel de reliure > Accessoires pour classeurs: Anneaux pour classeurs; Intercalaires; Pochettes plastiques
zh-CN: 办公用品 > 文件整理 > 装订用品 > 活页夹配件: 活页环; 索引隔片; 文件保护套
de: Bürobedarf > Ablage & Organisation > Bindesysteme > Aktenordnerzubehör: Einbandringe; Registerblätter; Klarsichthüllen